District of Columbia statutes.
38-914

Ceremonial expenses.

The President of the Federal City College, the President of the Washington Technical Institute, the President of the District of Columbia Teachers College, and the Superintendent of Schools are hereby authorized to utilize moneys appropriated for the purposes of this section for such expenses as they may respectively deem necessary to conduct such official ceremonial, and graduation activities as are normally associated with the programs of educational institutions.

Oct. 26, 1973, 87 Stat. 508, Pub. L. 93-140, § 24
1981 Ed., § 31-2214.
1973 Ed., § 31-1121.